Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB683.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3506. Offenses relating to critical infrastructure facilities.(a) Trespass.--(1) A person commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if the person willfully and knowingly trespasses or enters property containing a critical infrastructure facility without permission by the owner of the property or lawful occupant.(2) A person convicted of violating paragraph (1) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500 or to 123456789101112131415161718 imprisonment for not less than 30 days nor more than one year, or both.(3) Notwithstanding section 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy), a person commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if the person conspires with another person to commit the offense of trespass against a critical infrastructure facility in violation of this section.(4) Notwithstanding section 905 (relating to grading of criminal attempt, solicitation and conspiracy), a person convicted of violating paragraph (3) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $5,000.(5) A person commits a felony of the third degree if the person willfully and knowingly trespasses or enters property containing a critical infrastructure facility without permission by the owner of the property or lawful occupant with the intent to willfully damage, destroy, vandalize, deface, tamper with equipment or impede or inhibit operations of the critical infrastructure facility.(6) A person convicted of violating paragraph (5) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $1,000 or to imprisonment in a State correctional facility for not less than one year nor more than three years, or both.(b) Vandalism.--(1) A person commits a felony of the third degree if the person:(i) willfully damages, destroys, vandalizes, defaces or tampers with equipment in a critical infrastructure facility; or(ii) notwithstanding section 903, conspires with another person to willfully damage, destroy, vandalize, 20250SB0683PN0672 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deface or tamper with equipment in a critical infrastructure facility.(2) Grading for offenses under paragraph (1) shall be as follows:(i) A person convicted of violating paragraph (1)(i) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $2,000 or to imprisonment in a State correctional facility for not less than one year nor more than five years, or both.(ii) Notwithstanding section 905, a person convicted of violating paragraph (1)(ii) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $10,000.(c) Civil liability.--An owner of a critical infrastructure facility may file a cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction against a person who is arrested for or convicted of an offense under this section for damages to personal or real property, including damages to pipeline construction and pigging stations . (d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Critical infrastructure facility." Systems and assets, whether physical or virtual, so vital to the United States or the Commonwealth that the incapacity or destruction of the systems and assets would have a debilitating impact on security, national economic security, State economic security, national public health or safety, State public health or safety or any combination of those matters, whether the systems or assets are in operation or are under construction. The term includes the following, if completely enclosed by a fence or other physical barrier that is obviously designed to exclude intruders or if 20250SB0683PN0672 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clearly marked with a sign that is posted on the property that is reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders and indicates that entry is forbidden without site authorization:(1) A petroleum or alumina refinery.(2) An electrical power generating facility, substation, switching station, electrical control center or electric power lines and associated equipment infrastructure.(3) A chemical, polymer or rubber manufacturing facility.(4) A water intake structure, water treatment facility, wastewater treatment plant, pump station or finished water storage facility.(5) A natural gas compressor station.(6) A liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility.(7) Wireline and wireless telecommunications infrastructure.(8) A port, railroad switching yard, trucking terminal or other freight transportation facility.(9) A gas processing plant, including a plant used in the processing, treatment or fractionation of natural gas or natural gas liquids.(10) A transmission facility used by a federally licensed radio or television station.(11) A steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc furnace to make steel.(12) A facility identified and regulated by the United States Department of Homeland Security Chemical Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards program.(13) A dam that is regulated by the Federal or State Government.20250SB0683PN0672 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) A natural gas distribution utility facility, including pipeline interconnections, a city gate or town border station, metering station, below or above-ground pipeline or piping and truck loading or offloading facility, a natural gas storage facility, a natural gas transmission facility or a natural gas utility distribution facility.(15) A crude oil or refined products storage and distribution facility, including valve sites, pipeline interconnections, pump station, metering station, below or above-ground pipeline or piping and truck loading or offloading facility.(16) An above-ground portion of an oil, gas, hazardous liquid or chemical pipeline, tank or other storage facility.(17) Natural gas well pads and production facilities.(18) A broadband fiber cable facility.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0683PN0672 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516